District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.10

Street, avenue, or public thoroughfare prohibited within 1,000 feet of Naval Observatory.

No street, avenue, or public thoroughfare in the neighborhood of the buildings erected upon the United States Naval Observatory grounds, Georgetown Heights, District of Columbia, shall extend within the area of a circle described with a radius of 1,000 feet from the center of the building known as the clock room of the said Observatory.

Aug. 1, 1894, 28 Stat. 588, Joint Res. No. 40, § 1
1973 Ed., § 7-120.
1981 Ed., § 7-120.
This section is referenced in § 9-101.11.